Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256L.04, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Citizenship requirements. (a) Eligibility for MinnesotaCare is deleted text begin availabledeleted text end new text begin limitednew text end to citizens or nationals of the United Statesdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin andnew text end lawfully present noncitizens as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.20deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end Undocumented noncitizensnew text begin are ineligible for MinnesotaCarenew text end . For purposes of this subdivision, an undocumented noncitizen is an individual who resides in the United States without the approval or acquiescence of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. Families with children who are citizens or nationals of the United States must cooperate in obtaining satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or nationality according to the requirements of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, Public Law 109-171. (b) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 and 7, eligible persons include families and individuals who are new text begin lawfully present and new text end ineligible for medical assistance by reason of immigration status and who have incomes equal to or less than 200 percent of federal poverty guidelines, except that these persons may be eligible for emergency medical assistance under section 256B.06, subdivision 4. deleted text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, enrollment in MinnesotaCare for undocumented noncitizens who are age 18 years old or older is limited to those enrolled as of June 15, 2025. Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b), undocumented noncitizens who are age 18 years old or older are ineligible for MinnesotaCare beginning January 1, 2026. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end